Arkansas, session 2025, HB1751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-76-439(f), concerning authorization for
the Department of Human Services to promulgate rules related to job search
activities during the transitional employment assistance application process,
is amended to read as follows:
(f) The department may develop and promulgate rules requiring shall
require program applicants who have been determined to be job-ready to engage
in job search activities while the application is being processed.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-76-444, concerning the Arkansas Work
Pays Program, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(i) The department shall require Arkansas Work Pays Program applicants
who have been determined to be job-ready to engage in job search activities
*CRH144*
03-31-2025 13:21:28 CRH144

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1751
while the Arkansas Work Pays Program application is being processed.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 76, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-76-447. Recipients of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
benefits.
The Department of Human Services shall require an applicant for
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families benefits who has been determined to
be job-ready to engage in job search activities while his or her application
for benefits is being processed.

/s/Underwood
























03-31-2025 13:21:28 CRH144